Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1136
Council; adopt rules and regulations.

The council shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations providing for:

(1) Procedures and specifications for the installation, replacement, or repair of chemigation equipment;

(2) A system for the issuance of permits by the district to engage in chemigation;

(3) A procedure for a permitholder to follow when notifying the department and the appropriate district of any actual or suspected accident related to the use of chemigation;

(4) A procedure for the review and approval of a cleanup and recovery plan for an accident related to the use of chemigation;

(5) The posting of signs providing notice of the use of chemigation; and

(6) Any other chemigation practices necessary to carry out the Nebraska Chemigation Act.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 36.